Hawaii, session 2026, SB84.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  (a)  The department of education shall establish a cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) and automated external defibrillator (AED) training pilot program.  Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, the pilot program shall: (1)  Be conducted at all public middle schools, intermediate schools, and high schools in the State and shall be made available to all students in grades six through twelve; (2)  Be incorporated as an activity within the existing health or physical education curriculum; and (3)  Require each public elementary school, middle school, intermediate school, and high school in the State to establish a cardiac emergency response plan that establishes specific steps to reduce death from cardiac arrest. (b) The cardiac emergency response plan shall include practicing hands-on cardio pulmonary resuscitation and AED use, pursuant to instructional programs developed by the American Heart Association, American Red Cross, or other instructional program that is nationally recognized and integrates the most current evidence-based cardiovascular care guidelines for the performance of CPR and the use of an AED; provided that the plan shall also include: (1)  Establishment of a cardiac emergency response team; (2)  Activation of the cardiac emergency response team in the event of a sudden cardiac arrest or other life-threatening event on school grounds; (3)  Placement and routine maintenance of an AED within the school; (4)  Dissemination of the plan throughout the school campus; (5)  Maintenance of current staff training in the administration of an AED and CPR; (6)  Practice of drills for using an AED or performing CPR; (7)  Integration of local or county emergency service providers in the cardiac emergency response plan; (8)  Ongoing and annual review and evaluation of the cardiac emergency response plan; and (9)  Appropriate placement of AEDs, as dictated by the cardiac emergency response plan in accordance with the guidelines adopted by the American Heart Association, American Red Cross, or a nationally recognized instructional program based on the most current national evidence-based standards or core elements. (c) The appropriate school personnel and cardiac emergency response team members shall be trained in first-aid, cardiopulmonary resuscitation, and the use of an automated external defibrillator in accordance with guidelines adopted by the American Heart Association, American Red Cross, or a nationally recognized instructional program based on the most current national evidence-based emergency care standards or core elements.  School personnel trained to respond to a cardiac emergency shall include but not be limited to licensed coaches, school nurses, or athletic trainers; provided that the cardiac emergency response plan shall determine which school personnel require training. (d) School officials shall work directly with county emergency service providers to integrate the cardiac emergency response plan into the county's emergency medical service provider protocols. Each plan shall integrate evidence-based core elements, including those recognized by the American Heart Association, American Red Cross, or other nationally recognized evidence-based standards or core elements. (e)  The instruction required under this section shall not require a trainer certified in the administration of an AED or CPR to facilitate, provide, or oversee instruction for those individuals that do not require certifications; provided that a course resulting in certification shall be instructed by a trainer certified in the administration of an AED or CPR. (f) A public school may waive the requirement for instruction under this section for any student who is unable to participate in hands-on practicing of CPR or the operation of an AED by reasons of disability. (g) A local agency, entity of the State or local government, or other public or private organization that sponsors, authorizes, supports, finances, or supervises the instruction of students in compression-only CPR or the use of an AED shall not be liable for any civil damages alleged to result from the acts or omissions of an individual who receives the instruction. (h) A public employee who provides or facilitates the instruction of students in compression-only CPR or the use of an AED shall not be liable for any civil damages alleged to result from the acts or omissions of an individual who received the instruction. (i) The CPR and AED training pilot program shall terminate at the end of the 2029-2030 school year. SECTION 2. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________